California statutes. Elections Code
1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010

5739.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023

5741.00--the following census blocks:

3000

9800.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange
 County

0011.01, 0011.02, 0011.03, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.03, 0013.04, 0014.01, 0014.02, 0014.04, 0015.03, 0015.04, 0016.04, 0017.09, 1100.06, 1100.14, 1101.08

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0014.03--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

0015.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023,
 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020

0015.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017

0015.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

0015.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3026, 3027, 3028

0016.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

0017.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000

0017.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

0117.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

0218.14--the following census blocks:

4005, 4015, 4016, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4032

1100.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3024, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

1100.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

1100.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007,
 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4020, 4021

1100.15--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3026

1101.13--the following census blocks:

2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

1101.17--the following census blocks:

4004, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21442.

Congressional District 42 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 42

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

5715.04, 5718.00, 5719.00, 5722.01, 5722.02, 5730.02, 5730.03, 5730.04, 5731.01, 5731.02, 5732.01, 5732.02, 5733.00, 5734.01, 5734.02, 5734.03, 5740.00, 5742.01, 5742.02, 5743.00, 5744.00, 5745.00, 5746.02, 5748.00, 5749.01, 5749.02, 5750.01, 5750.02, 5751.01, 5751.02, 5751.03, 5752.01, 5752.02, 5753.00, 5754.01, 5754.02, 5758.01, 5758.02, 5758.03, 5759.01, 5759.02, 5760.01, 5762.00, 5763.01, 5763.02, 5764.01, 5764.02, 5764.03, 5765.01, 5765.02, 5765.03, 5766.01, 5766.02, 5767.00, 5768.01, 5768.02, 5769.01, 5769.03,
 5769.04, 5770.00, 5771.00, 5772.00, 5773.00, 5774.00, 5775.01, 5775.04, 5776.02, 5776.04, 5776.05, 5776.06, 5779.00, 5781.00, 5990.00, 5991.00, 9800.07, 9800.18

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

5712.01--the following census blocks:

2006

5715.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

5715.05--the following census blocks:

2005, 2013

5720.01--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024

5726.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

5727.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

5736.01--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003

5737.00--the following census blocks:

2009

5739.02--the following census blocks:

1014

5741.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011

5777.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001

5780.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011,
 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

9800.06--the following census blocks:

1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016

9800.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053

9800.33--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081

9903.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0626.42, 0627.01, 0627.02, 0628.00, 0629.00, 0630.04, 0630.05, 0630.06, 0630.08, 0630.09, 0630.10, 0631.02, 0631.03, 0632.01, 0632.02, 0633.01, 0633.02, 0634.00, 0635.00, 0636.01, 0636.03, 0636.04, 0636.05, 0637.01, 0637.02, 0638.02, 0638.03, 0638.05, 0638.06, 0638.07,
 0638.08, 0639.02, 0639.03, 0639.04, 0639.05, 0639.06, 0639.08, 0639.09, 0639.10, 0740.05, 0740.06, 0741.07, 0992.12, 0992.14, 0992.15, 0992.16, 0992.17, 0992.20, 0992.35, 0992.37, 0992.38, 0992.39, 0992.40, 0992.42, 0992.43, 0992.44, 0992.45, 0992.46, 0993.05, 0993.06, 0993.07, 0993.08, 0993.09, 0993.10, 0993.11, 0994.02, 0994.04, 0994.05, 0994.06, 0994.07, 0994.08, 0994.10, 0994.11, 0994.12, 0994.15, 0994.16, 0994.17, 0994.18, 0994.19, 0995.04, 0995.06, 0995.08, 0995.09, 0995.10, 0995.11, 0995.12, 0995.13, 0995.14, 0996.04, 0996.05

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0626.10--the following census blocks:

5021, 5022, 5023, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5049, 5052, 5053, 5054, 5055, 5058, 5059, 5060, 5061, 5062, 5063, 5064, 5065, 5066, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5073, 5074, 5076, 5077, 5078, 5079, 5080,
 5081, 5082, 5083, 5084, 5085, 5097, 5098, 5099, 5100, 5101, 5102, 5103, 5104, 5105

0626.14--the following census blocks:

8013, 8014, 8015, 8016

0626.43--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 7015

0630.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012,
 4013

0631.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0740.04--the following census blocks:

1008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012

0741.02--the following census blocks:

2011, 2012, 3011

0741.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005,
 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022

0741.10--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0741.11--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0755.16--the following census blocks:

6077, 6078, 6103, 6104

0992.41--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2018

0995.02--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1014, 1016, 1018, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1054, 1055, 1058, 1059

0996.02--the following census blocks:

1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009

0996.03--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027

0997.02--the following census
 blocks:

2009, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021

0997.03--the following census blocks:

1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022

1100.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3022, 3025

1100.08--the following census blocks:

2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017

1100.12--the following census blocks:

4018, 4019

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21443.

Congressional District 43 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 43

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

2402.00, 2403.01, 2403.02, 2404.01, 2404.02, 2405.00, 2406.00, 2407.00, 2408.00, 2409.01, 2409.02, 2410.01, 2410.02, 2411.10, 2411.20, 2412.01, 2412.02, 2413.00, 2414.00, 2420.00, 2421.00, 2422.01, 2422.02, 2423.00, 2426.00, 2427.00, 2430.01, 2430.02, 2431.00, 2761.01, 2761.02, 2774.00, 2911.10, 2911.20, 2911.30, 2912.10, 2912.20, 5404.00, 5406.00, 5407.00, 5408.00, 5409.01, 5409.02, 5411.00, 5412.00, 5413.00, 5414.01, 5414.02, 5415.00, 5416.03, 5416.04, 5416.05, 5416.06, 5420.00, 5421.03, 5421.04, 5421.05, 5421.06,
 5422.00, 5424.01, 5424.02, 5425.01, 5425.02, 5426.01, 5426.02, 5427.00, 5428.00, 5429.00, 5430.00, 5432.01, 5432.03, 6001.00, 6002.01, 6002.02, 6003.02, 6003.03, 6003.04, 6004.00, 6005.01, 6006.01, 6006.02, 6007.02, 6007.03, 6007.04, 6008.01, 6008.02, 6009.02, 6009.11, 6009.12, 6010.01, 6010.02, 6011.00, 6012.02, 6012.11, 6012.12, 6013.01, 6013.02, 6013.03, 6014.01, 6014.02, 6015.01, 6015.02, 6016.00, 6017.00, 6018.01, 6018.02, 6019.00, 6020.02, 6020.03, 6021.03, 6021.04, 6021.05, 6021.06, 6022.01, 6022.02, 6023.01, 6023.02, 6024.02, 6024.03, 6024.04, 6025.04, 6025.05, 6025.06, 6025.07, 6025.10, 6025.11, 6025.12, 6025.13, 6026.01, 6026.02, 6027.00, 6028.01, 6028.02, 6029.00, 6030.04, 6030.05, 6030.06, 6030.07, 6030.08, 6031.01, 6031.02, 6032.00, 6033.01, 6033.02, 6034.00, 6035.00, 6036.00, 6037.02, 6037.03, 6037.05, 6037.06, 6038.01, 6038.02, 6039.01, 6039.02, 6040.01, 6040.02, 6041.01, 6041.02, 6042.00, 6500.01, 6500.03, 6500.04, 6501.01, 6501.02, 6502.00, 6504.01, 6506.04, 6506.05, 6508.01, 6508.02,
 6509.01, 6509.03, 6509.04, 9800.05

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

2380.00--the following census blocks:

2000

2382.00--the following census blocks:

2018, 2019, 3013

2383.20--the following census blocks:

3001

2397.02--the following census blocks:

2006

2400.10--the following census blocks:

2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2020

2400.20--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011,
 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

2766.07--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005

2766.08--the following census blocks:

1006

2772.00--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

2780.01--the following census blocks:

1018, 2020, 2021

2913.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022

5410.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1037

5418.01--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3007, 3008

5418.02--the following census blocks:

1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026

5431.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 5004, 5005

5433.05--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008,
 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1028, 1084, 1085

6503.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5011

6505.01--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 2001, 2002, 3005

6506.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005

6506.07--the following census blocks:

1000

6507.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038

7030.02--the following census blocks:

3012, 3013

9800.28--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21444.

Congressional District 44 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 44

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

2920.01, 2920.02, 2932.03, 2932.04, 2932.05, 2932.06, 2933.07, 2941.10, 2941.20, 2942.00, 2943.01, 2943.02, 2944.10, 2945.10, 2945.20, 2946.10, 2946.20, 2947.01, 2948.10, 2948.20, 2948.30, 2949.00, 2951.03, 2962.10, 2962.20, 2963.00, 2964.01, 2964.02, 2965.00, 2966.00, 2969.01, 2969.02, 2970.01, 2970.02, 2971.10, 2971.20, 2972.01, 2972.02, 2973.00, 2974.00, 2975.01, 2975.02, 2976.01, 2976.02, 5325.00, 5326.05, 5326.06, 5326.07, 5327.00, 5328.00, 5329.00, 5330.01, 5330.02, 5331.03, 5331.04, 5331.05, 5331.08, 5332.01,
 5332.04, 5335.01, 5335.04, 5345.01, 5345.02, 5347.00, 5348.02, 5348.03, 5348.04, 5349.00, 5350.01, 5350.02, 5351.01, 5351.02, 5352.00, 5353.00, 5354.00, 5355.01, 5355.02, 5355.03, 5356.03, 5356.04, 5356.05, 5356.06, 5356.07, 5357.01, 5357.02, 5358.02, 5358.03, 5358.04, 5359.01, 5359.02, 5360.00, 5361.02, 5361.03, 5361.04, 5362.01, 5362.02, 5400.00, 5401.01, 5401.02, 5402.01, 5402.02, 5402.03, 5403.00, 5405.01, 5405.02, 5417.00, 5433.04, 5433.06, 5433.21, 5433.22, 5434.00, 5435.01, 5435.02, 5435.03, 5436.01, 5436.03, 5436.05, 5436.06, 5436.07, 5437.01, 5437.03, 5437.04, 5437.05, 5438.01, 5438.03, 5438.04, 5439.03, 5439.05, 5440.01, 5440.02, 5535.02, 5535.03, 5535.04, 5536.01, 5536.02, 5537.01, 5537.02, 5538.01, 5538.02, 5539.01, 5539.02, 5702.02, 5702.03, 5703.03, 5703.04, 5703.05, 5703.06, 5704.02, 5704.03, 5704.04, 5705.02, 5705.03, 5705.04, 5706.01, 5706.02, 5716.00, 5717.01, 5717.03, 5717.04, 5723.01, 5725.00, 6099.00, 9800.02, 9800.14, 9800.15, 9800.16, 9800.25, 9800.31, 9800.37

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

2913.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

2933.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

2933.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

2944.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3003

5333.00--the following census blocks:

1001

5410.03--the following census blocks:

1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1034, 1036, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057

5418.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009

5418.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

5431.00--the following census blocks:

5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023

5433.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099

5701.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

5702.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000,
 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

5706.03--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003

5715.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1006

5715.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

5726.00--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014,
 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

5727.00--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010

5777.00--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

5780.00--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004

9800.11--the following census blocks:

1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1033, 1054

9800.33--the following census blocks:

1023

9903.00--the following census blocks:

0007

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21445.

Congressional District 45 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 45

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

5521.00, 5526.01, 5526.02, 5527.00, 5528.00, 5529.00, 5530.00, 5545.11, 5545.12, 5545.13, 5545.14, 5545.15, 5545.16, 5545.17, 5545.18, 5545.19, 5545.21, 5545.22, 5546.00, 5547.00, 5548.01, 5548.02, 5549.00, 5551.05, 5551.06, 5551.07, 5552.11, 5552.12

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

5519.00--the following census blocks:

2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009,
 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4011, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017

5520.01--the following census blocks:

2006, 2007, 2008, 3006, 3007, 3008

5520.02--the following census blocks:

2010, 2011

5522.00--the following census blocks:

2004, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030

5550.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005,
 1006, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

5550.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009

5710.00--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3008

5738.00--the following census blocks:

1000

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0016.02, 0017.04, 0017.06, 0017.10, 0114.02, 0115.03, 0115.04, 0117.12, 0117.21, 0880.01, 0880.02, 0881.04, 0881.05, 0881.06, 0881.07, 0882.01, 0882.02, 0882.03,
 0883.01, 0884.01, 0885.01, 0885.02, 0886.01, 0886.02, 0887.01, 0887.02, 0888.01, 0888.02, 0889.01, 0889.02, 0889.03, 0889.04, 0889.05, 0890.01, 0890.03, 0891.06, 0992.02, 0992.03, 0992.04, 0992.22, 0992.23, 0992.24, 0992.25, 0992.26, 0992.27, 0992.29, 0992.30, 0992.31, 0992.32, 0992.33, 0992.34, 0992.47, 0992.50, 0992.51, 0996.01, 0997.01, 0998.01, 0998.02, 0998.03, 0999.02, 0999.03, 0999.04, 0999.05, 0999.06, 1100.01, 1100.03, 1100.04, 1100.05, 1100.10, 1100.11, 1101.02, 1101.04, 1101.06, 1101.09, 1101.10, 1101.11, 1101.14, 1101.15, 1101.16, 1101.18, 1103.01, 1103.02, 1103.03, 1103.04, 1105.00, 1106.03, 1106.06, 1106.07

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0015.05--the following census blocks:

3007, 3013, 3019

0016.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008,
 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027

0017.05--the following census blocks:

3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0017.08--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0018.01--the following census blocks:

1004, 1014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004

0018.02--the following census blocks:

3005

0110.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

0112.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0113.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030

0114.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

0114.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007

0115.02--the following census blocks:

3000, 3007

0117.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0117.11--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

0117.14--the following census blocks:

1026

0117.20--the following census blocks:

2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0117.22--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0741.08--the following census blocks:

2004, 2016, 2017

0748.03--the following census blocks:

2005

0761.03--the following census blocks:

1003, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002

0868.01--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0868.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0875.03--the following census blocks:

5004, 5014, 5015

0876.02--the following census blocks:

2008, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019

0878.06--the following census blocks:

2006, 2012

0879.01--the following census blocks:

1012

0879.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013,
 3000, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0881.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056

0883.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0884.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

0884.03--the following census blocks:

1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0890.04--the following census blocks:

1001, 1003, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3002

0891.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

0891.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

0891.07--the following census blocks:

1005, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015,
 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

0992.41--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0995.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1056, 1057, 1060

0996.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000

0996.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0997.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

0997.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1003, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014,
 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

1100.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3027

1101.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032

1101.17--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011,
 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

1102.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

1102.02--the following census blocks:

2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

1102.03--the following census blocks:

1003, 1006, 1007,
 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

1104.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

1104.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

1106.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018

1106.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4008, 4009, 4010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21446.

Congressional District 46 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 46

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0019.01, 0019.02, 0019.03, 0111.01, 0111.02, 0116.01, 0116.02, 0117.10, 0117.15, 0117.16, 0741.03, 0741.09, 0742.00, 0743.00, 0744.03, 0744.05, 0745.01, 0745.02, 0746.01, 0746.02, 0747.01, 0747.02, 0748.01, 0748.02, 0748.05, 0748.06, 0749.01, 0749.02, 0750.02, 0750.03, 0750.04, 0751.00, 0752.01, 0752.02, 0753.01, 0753.02, 0753.03, 0754.01, 0754.04, 0754.05, 0758.05, 0758.06, 0758.07, 0758.08, 0759.01, 0759.02, 0760.01, 0760.02, 0761.02, 0761.04, 0761.05, 0762.01, 0762.04, 0863.01, 0863.03, 0863.04, 0863.05, 0863.06, 0864.02,
 0864.04, 0864.05, 0864.06, 0865.01, 0865.02, 0866.01, 0866.02, 0867.01, 0867.02, 0868.02, 0869.01, 0869.02, 0869.03, 0870.01, 0870.02, 0871.01, 0871.02, 0871.03, 0871.05, 0871.06, 0872.00, 0873.01, 0873.02, 0874.01, 0874.03, 0874.04, 0874.05, 0875.04, 0875.05, 0876.01, 0877.01, 0877.03, 0877.04, 0878.01, 0878.02, 0878.03, 0878.05, 0891.05, 0992.48, 0992.49, 9800.00

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0018.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4005

0018.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001,
 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 4000, 5000, 5001

0110.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013

0112.00--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

0113.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005,
 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0114.01--the following census blocks:

2010

0114.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019

0115.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028

0117.08--the following census
 blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3013

0117.09--the following census blocks:
